Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1833
Authority; general powers; joint projects.

The authority may do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act.

In carrying out the purposes of the act, the authority may undertake a project for two or more elementary or secondary schools jointly, or for any combination thereof, and thereupon all other provisions of the act shall apply to and be for the benefit of the authority and such joint participants.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 33.